Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 1. General Benefits
§ 1325.
Employers’ experience-rating records; disclosure to successor entity.

The Commissioner shall maintain an experience-rating record for each employer. Benefits paid shall be charged against the experience-rating record of each subject employer who provided base-period wages to the eligible individual. Each subject employer’s experience-rating charge shall bear the same ratio to total benefits paid as the total base-period wages paid by that employer bear to the total base-period wages paid to the individual by all base-period employers. The experience-rating record of an individual subject base-period employer shall not be charged for benefits paid to an individual under any of the following conditions:
(a) (1) The Commissioner shall maintain an experience-rating record for each employer. Benefits paid shall be charged against the experience-rating record of each subject employer who provided base-period wages to the eligible individual. Each subject employer’s experience-rating charge shall bear the same ratio to total benefits paid as the total base-period wages paid by that employer bear to the total base-period wages paid to the individual by all base-period employers. The experience-rating record of an individual subject base-period employer shall not be charged for benefits paid to an individual under any of the following conditions:

The individual’s employment with that employer was terminated under disqualifying circumstances.

The individual’s employment or right to reemployment with that employer was terminated by retirement of the individual pursuant to a retirement or lump-sum retirement pay plan under which the age of mandatory retirement was agreed upon by the employer and its employees or by the bargaining agent representing those employees.

As of the date on which the individual filed an initial claim for benefits, the individual’s employment with that employer had not been terminated or reduced in hours.

The individual was employed by that employer as a result of another employee taking leave under chapter 5, subchapter 4 of this title, and the individual’s employment was terminated as a result of the reinstatement of the other employee under chapter 5, subchapter 4 of this title.

[Repealed.]

The individual voluntarily separated from that employer to accompany a spouse who is on active duty with the U.S. Armed Forces or who holds a commission in the U.S. Foreign Service and is assigned overseas as provided by subdivision 1344(a)(2)(A) of this chapter.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

If an individual’s unemployment is directly caused by a major disaster declared by the President of the United States pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 5122 and the individual would have been eligible for federal disaster unemployment assistance benefits but for the receipt of regular benefits, an employer shall be relieved of charges for benefits paid to the individual with respect to any week of unemployment occurring due to the natural disaster up to a maximum amount of four weeks.

[Repealed.]

Disclosure of contribution rate to successor entity. Any individual or employing unit who in any manner succeeds to or acquires the organization, trade, or business or substantially all of the assets of any employer who has been operating the business within two weeks prior to the acquisition, except any assets retained by the employer incident to the liquidation of the employer’s obligations, and who thereafter continues the acquired business shall be considered to be a successor to the predecessor from whom the business was acquired and, if not already an employer before the acquisition, shall become an employer on the date of the acquisition. The Commissioner shall transfer the experience-rating record of the predecessor employer to the successor employer. If the successor was not an employer before the date of acquisition, the successor’s rate of contribution for the remainder of the rate year shall be the rate applicable to the predecessor employers with respect to the period immediately preceding the date of acquisition if there was only one predecessor or there were only predecessors with identical rates. If the predecessors’ rates were not identical, the Commissioner shall determine a rate based on the combined experience of all the predecessor employers. If the successor was an employer before the date of acquisition, the contribution rate that was assigned to the successor for the rate year in which the acquisition occurred will remain assigned to the successor for the remainder of the rate year, after which the experience-rating record of the predecessor shall be combined with the experience rating of the successor to form the single employer experience-rating record of the successor. At any time prior to the issuance of the certificate required by subsection 1322(b) of this chapter, an employing unit shall, upon request of a potential successor, disclose to the potential successor its current experience-rating record.
(b) (1) Disclosure of contribution rate to successor entity. Any individual or employing unit who in any manner succeeds to or acquires the organization, trade, or business or substantially all of the assets of any employer who has been operating the business within two weeks prior to the acquisition, except any assets retained by the employer incident to the liquidation of the employer’s obligations, and who thereafter continues the acquired business shall be considered to be a successor to the predecessor from whom the business was acquired and, if not already an employer before the acquisition, shall become an employer on the date of the acquisition. The Commissioner shall transfer the experience-rating record of the predecessor employer to the successor employer. If the successor was not an employer before the date of acquisition, the successor’s rate of contribution for the remainder of the rate year shall be the rate applicable to the predecessor employers with respect to the period immediately preceding the date of acquisition if there was only one predecessor or there were only predecessors with identical rates. If the predecessors’ rates were not identical, the Commissioner shall determine a rate based on the combined experience of all the predecessor employers. If the successor was an employer before the date of acquisition, the contribution rate that was assigned to the successor for the rate year in which the acquisition occurred will remain assigned to the successor for the remainder of the rate year, after which the experience-rating record of the predecessor shall be combined with the experience rating of the successor to form the single employer experience-rating record of the successor. At any time prior to the issuance of the certificate required by subsection 1322(b) of this chapter, an employing unit shall, upon request of a potential successor, disclose to the potential successor its current experience-rating record.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, an individual or employing unit who in any manner succeeds to or acquires the organization, trade, or business or substantially all of the assets of any employing unit who was an employer before the date of acquisition and whose currently assigned contribution rate is higher than that currently assigned to the acquiring individual or employing unit shall not be treated as a successor.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant to any employer or to individuals performing services for the employer prior claims or rights to the amounts paid by the employer into the Fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following shall apply to assignment of rates and transfers of experience:

If an employer transfers its trade or business, or a portion thereof, to another employer and, at the time of the transfer, there is substantially common ownership, management, or control of the two employers, the employment experience attributable to the transferred trade or business shall be transferred to the employer to whom such business is so transferred. The rates of both employers shall be recalculated and made effective immediately upon the date of the transfer of trade or business.

Whenever a person who is not an employer under this chapter at the time it acquires the trade or business of an employer, the unemployment experience of the acquired business shall not be transferred to such person if the Commissioner finds that such person acquired the business solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions. Instead, that person shall be assigned the highest rate assignable under this chapter until being subject to this chapter for a sufficient period of time to have his or her rate computed under section 1326 of this title. In determining whether the business was acquired solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contribution, the Commissioner shall use objective factors that may include:

the cost of acquiring the business;

whether the person continued the business enterprise of the acquired business;

how long that business enterprise was continued; and

whether a substantial number of new employees was hired to perform duties unrelated to the business activity conducted prior to acquisition of the new business.

If a person knowingly violates or attempts to violate subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection or any other provision of this chapter related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate, or if a person knowingly advises another person in a way that results in a violation of those provisions, the person shall be subject to the following penalties:

If the person is an employer, the person shall be assigned the highest rate assignable under this chapter for the rate year during which the violation or attempted violation occurred and the three rate years immediately following this rate year. If the person’s business is already at the highest rate for any year, or if the amount of increase in the person’s rate would be less than two percent for that year, a penalty rate of contributions of two percent of taxable wages shall be imposed for that year.

If the person is not an employer, that person shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00. A fine under this subdivision shall be deposited in the Contingent Fund established under section 1365 of this title.

In addition to other penalties under this subdivision, a person who violates this section may be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

As used in this section:

“Attempt to violate” means the intent to evade, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure.

“Knowingly” means having actual knowledge of or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard of the prohibition.

“Person” has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

“Trade or business” includes the employer’s workforce.

The Commissioner shall establish procedures, by rule, to identify the transfer or acquisition of a business for the purposes of this section.

-(g) [Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 132

, eff. May 19, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1963, No. 98

;

1967, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 28, 1968;

1969, No. 42

, § 1;

1977, No. 64

, § 13;

1981, No. 86

, § 10, eff. May 10, 1981;

1985, No. 50

, § 8;

1985, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1987, No. 100

, § 1;

1989, No. 17

, eff. April 13, 1989;

1989, No. 47

, §§ 1, 2, eff. May 18, 1989;

1989, No. 83

, § 2;

1997, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7, 9;

2005, No. 41

, § 1;

2009, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2011, No. 50

, § 9c, eff. July 1, 2011;

2013, No. 82

, § 1, eff. June 10, 2013;

2013, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2017, No. 74

, § 49;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. March 30, 2020;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. Oct. 1, 2021;

2021, No. 51

, § 6, eff. June 1, 2021.

Part-time employment.

Where an employee works part time on an as-needed basis, the employer is entitled to the benefit of the provision that the experience-rating record of a base-period employer shall not be charged if an individual’s employment with that employer has not been terminated or reduced in hours. In re Loyal Order of Moose, Inc. Lodge # 1090, 2005 VT 31, 178 Vt. 510, 872 A.2d 345, 2005 Vt. LEXIS 43 (2005) (mem.).

§ 1326.
Rate based on benefit experience.

The Commissioner shall for each rate year compute a benefit ratio for each employer who meets the requirements of section 1327 of this title. For an employer whose record has been chargeable with benefits throughout the three consecutive calendar years immediately preceding the rate year for which the ratio is computed, the benefit ratio shall be the quotient obtained by dividing the total benefits charged to his or her record in such three years by the total of his or her taxable payrolls for the same three-year period; for an employer whose record has been chargeable with benefits for at least one but less than three consecutive calendar years immediately preceding the rate year for which the ratio is computed, the benefit ratio shall be the quotient obtained by dividing the total benefits charged to his or her record for such calendar year or years by the total of his or her taxable payrolls for the same period. The contribution rate of each employer, not otherwise ineligible, who meets the requirements of section 1327 of this title, shall be determined under subsections (b) through (g) of this section.

The Commissioner shall prepare a schedule on which he or she shall list all employers for whom a benefit ratio has been computed pursuant to this section, in the order of their benefit ratios, beginning with the lowest such ratio, and on which shall be shown with respect to each such employer:

the amount of his or her benefit ratio;

the amount of his or her annual taxable payroll; and

a cumulative total consisting of the amount of his or her annual taxable payroll plus the amount of the annual taxable payrolls of all other employers preceding him or her on the list.

The Commissioner shall segregate employers so listed into classes in accordance with the cumulative payrolls. The classes shall be determined by the cumulative payroll percentage limits set forth in column B of the table below. Each such class shall be identified by the rate class number in column A that is opposite the figures in column B that represents the percentage limits of each class. In the event an employer’s taxable payroll falls in more than one rate class, he or she shall be assigned to the lower numbered rate class except that no employer shall be assigned to a higher rate class than is assigned any other employer with the same benefit ratio.

The Commissioner shall compute a current fund ratio, and a highest benefit cost rate, as follows:

The current fund ratio shall be determined by dividing the available balance of the Unemployment Compensation Fund on December 31 of the preceding calendar year by the total wages paid for employment during that calendar year as reported by employers by the following March 31.

The highest benefit cost rate shall be determined by dividing the highest amount of benefit payments made during a consecutive 12-month period that ended within the 10-year period ending on the preceding December 31, by the total wages paid during the four calendar quarter periods that ended within that 12-month period.
(2) (A) The highest benefit cost rate shall be determined by dividing the highest amount of benefit payments made during a consecutive 12-month period that ended within the 10-year period ending on the preceding December 31, by the total wages paid during the four calendar quarter periods that ended within that 12-month period.

Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (A) of this subdivision (d)(2) to the contrary, when computing the tax rate schedule to become effective on July 1, 2021 and on each subsequent July 1, the Commissioner shall calculate the highest benefit cost rate without consideration of benefit payments made in calendar year 2020.

The rate schedule shall be determined by dividing the current fund ratio by the highest benefit cost rate. The applicable rate schedule shall be that schedule below the resultant quotient that appears in column C of the following table:

The contribution rate to become effective July 1, 1977 and thereafter on July 1 of each year shall be the rate determined for that class into which the given employer is placed by application of this section.

If, subsequent to the assignment of rates of contribution for any rate year, the benefit ratio of any employer is recomputed and changed, such employer shall be placed in that position on the list that he or she would have occupied had his or her corrected benefit ratio been shown on the list, but such altered position on the list shall not affect the position of any other employer.

In the determination of a rate schedule, only the wages paid by employers liable for payment of contributions into the fund and benefit payments not reimbursable by employers liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall be considered in the computation of a current fund ratio and highest benefit cost rate.

B. C. IF THE RESULTING QUOTIENT IS: Rate % of Taxable 2.50 2.00 1.50 1.00 Class Payrolls and to to to under over 2.49 1.99 1.49 1.00 From To I. II. III. IV. V. 0 00.00 00.00 0.4% 0.6% 0.8% 1.1% 1.3% 1 00.01 05.00 0.5 0.7 0.9 1.2 1.5 2 05.01 10.00 0.6 0.8 1.1 1.4 1.8 3 10.01 15.00 0.7 1.0 1.4 1.7 2.1 4 15.01 20.00 0.8 1.2 1.7 2.0 2.4 5 20.01 25.00 0.9 1.4 2.0 2.3 2.7 6 25.01 30.00 1.1 1.7 2.3 2.6 3.0 7 30.01 35.00 1.4 2.0 2.6 2.9 3.3 8 35.01 40.00 1.7 2.3 2.9 3.2 3.6 9 40.01 45.00 2.0 2.6 3.2 3.5 4.0 10 45.01 50.00 2.3 2.9 3.5 3.8 4.4 11 50.01 55.00 2.6 3.2 3.8 4.1 4.8 12 55.01 60.00 2.9 3.5 4.1 4.5 5.2 13 60.01 65.00 3.2 3.8 4.4 4.9 5.6 14 65.01 70.00 3.5 4.1 4.7 5.3 6.0 15 70.01 75.00 3.8 4.4 5.0 5.7 6.4 16 75.01 80.00 4.1 4.7 5.3 6.1 6.8 17 80.01 85.00 4.4 5.0 5.6 6.5 7.2 18 85.01 90.00 4.7 5.3 5.9 6.9 7.6 19 90.01 95.00 5.0 5.6 6.2 7.3 8.0 20 95.01 100.00 5.4 5.9 6.5 7.7 8.4

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 65

, eff. Jan. 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1963, No. 106

, § 2;

1965, No. 77

, § 1;

1967, No. 159

, § 1;

1969, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.);

1973, No. 31

, § 1, eff. March 27, 1973;

1977, No. 64

, § 14, eff. Jan. 1, 1977;

1983, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2021, No. 51

, § 9a, eff. June 1, 2021.

§ 1327.
Rate, reduction, conditions.

No employer’s contribution rate shall be reduced from five and four-tenths percent for any rate year, except as provided in section 1324 of this title, unless and until his or her experience-rating record has been chargeable with benefits throughout the three consecutive calendar years immediately preceding the rate year with respect to which said rate shall be reduced and contributions were payable by him or her with respect to such three calendar years; provided that an employer who has not been subject to the law for a period of time sufficient to meet this requirement may qualify for a reduced rate if his or her record has been chargeable with benefits throughout a lesser number of consecutive calendar years but in no event less than one calendar year immediately preceding the rate year with respect to which said rate shall be reduced and contributions were payable by him or her with respect to such period.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 106

, § 3;

1971, No. 77

, § 5, eff. Dec. 31, 1971;

1983, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 1328.
Filing employer quarterly tax contribution reports; failure.

The Commissioner shall impose a penalty of $100.00 for each failure by an employer to file any contribution report required under section 1322 of this title on or before the date on which the report is due, which shall be collected in the manner provided for the collection of contributions in section 1329 of this title and shall be paid into the Contingent Fund provided in section 1365 of this title. If the employer demonstrates that its failure was due to a reasonable cause, the Commissioner may waive or reduce the penalty.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1963, No. 106

, § 5;

1967, No. 178

;

1985, No. 50

, § 9;

1989, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 1329.
Collection of unpaid contributions; suit.

If any employer fails to make, when due, any contributions or payments required of him or her under this chapter, the obligation shall carry interest at the rate of:
(a) (1) If any employer fails to make, when due, any contributions or payments required of him or her under this chapter, the obligation shall carry interest at the rate of:

one percent per month from due date if the due date is prior to July 31, 1983;

two and one-half percent per month from due date if the due date is subsequent to July 31, 1983 and on or prior to July 31, 1987;

one and one-half percent per month from due date if the due date is subsequent to July 31, 1987.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to collect the overdue obligations and interest. Interest so collected shall be paid into the Contingent Fund provided in section 1365 of this title. Provided, that if an employer has paid such contributions or payments timely to another state through error, the Commissioner may waive such interest. Provided further, that the Commissioner may waive all or a portion of such interest in any case in which, in the Commissioner’s determination, the untimeliness of the payment was not caused by fault, neglect, or bad faith on the part of the employer.

In addition to other remedies and proceedings authorized by this chapter, a civil action in the name of the Commissioner may be maintained and the remedies available in such action, including attachment and trustee process, shall be available to the Commissioner for the collection of contributions, interest, and penalties under this chapter.

An employer failing, for any two calendar quarters during the preceding 20 calendar quarters, to make return or to pay contributions required under this chapter, and who has not ceased to be an employer as provided in section 1323 of this title, may be required by the Commissioner to furnish a good and sufficient bond conditioned upon the payment of such delinquent contributions, together with interest and penalty from the due date thereof, and containing such terms as may be determined by the Commissioner. An employer who fails to furnish such bond when required by the Commissioner may be enjoined from employing individuals in employment, as defined by this chapter, upon complaint of the Commissioner in the Superior Court of any county in which the employer is doing business, until the contributions due, together with interest and penalty, are paid to the Commissioner.

In the event of an employer’s dissolution, adjudicated insolvency, adjudicated bankruptcy, receivership, assignment for benefit of creditors, judicially confirmed extension proposals or composition, claims or contributions due under this chapter and for interest thereon then or thereafter due under this chapter shall be a lien upon such employer’s assets and shall have priority over all other claims except expenses of administration, taxes, wage claims, and prior liens valid under the laws of this State.

No action shall be commenced for the collection of contributions, interest and penalties under this chapter more than three years after the date on which the contributions became due and payable, unless prior to the expiration of the three-year period:

an assessment proceeding has been instituted under the provisions of section 1330 of this title;

a civil action has been instituted under subsection (b) of this section; or

a lien has been created under section 1336 of this title.

The provisions of subsection (e) of this section shall not apply where an employer by willful failure or refusal to file a report with the Commissioner or to include in any report all wages that he has paid, or otherwise has attempted to avoid or reduce liability for the payment of contributions.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1965, No. 27

, eff. April 14, 1965;

1967, No. 61

;

1969, No. 41

;

1983, No. 16

, § 6;

1985, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 16, 1986;

1987, No. 100

, § 2;

2017, No. 74

, § 50.

§ 1330.
Assessment provided.

When any employer fails to pay any contributions or payments required under this chapter the Commissioner shall make an assessment of contributions against such employer together with interest and penalty thereon. After making the assessment, due notice shall be given thereof, by ordinary or certified mail, to the employer and the assessment shall be final unless the employer petitions for a hearing on such assessment within the time hereinafter specified.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 210

, § 7, eff. July 11, 1961;

1989, No. 8

, § 1;

1989, No. 8

, § 1;

1991, No. 82

, § 2.

§ 1331.
Notice; hearing.

Any employer against whom an assessment is made may, within 30 days after date thereof, file with the Commissioner a petition for a hearing before a referee appointed for such purpose, which petition shall set forth specifically and in detail the grounds upon which it is claimed the assessment is erroneous. Hearing or hearings on the assessment shall be held by the referee at such times and places as may be provided by rules and regulations of the Board and due notice of the time and place of such hearing or hearings shall be given by ordinary or certified mail to the petitioner.
After hearing as above provided, the petitioner shall be promptly notified by ordinary or certified mail of the findings of fact, conclusions, and decision of the referee.
The decision of the referee shall be final unless the employer or Commissioner makes application for review thereof by the Board within 30 days after date thereof or unless the Board, on its own motion within said period, initiates a review thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 8, eff. July 11, 1961;

1989, No. 8

, § 2;

1991, No. 82

, § 3.

§ 1332.
Review by board; Supreme Court appeal.

The Board, upon an application filed or on its own motion, within the time specified, shall, on notice to interested parties, review the decision of the referee. Before rendering its decision, the Board may order the taking of additional evidence by the referee or, in its discretion, the Board may hear additional evidence to be made a part of the record in the case.
Upon the basis of evidence previously submitted in the case and such additional evidence as the Board may take or direct to be taken, the Board may affirm, modify, or reverse the findings and conclusions of the referee and shall render its decision thereon.
The parties shall be promptly notified by ordinary or certified mail of the findings of fact, conclusions, and decision of the Board. The decision of the Board shall be final unless an appeal is taken therefrom to the Supreme Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 9, eff. July 11, 1961;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 195, eff. March 29, 1972;

1989, No. 8

, § 3;

1991, No. 82

, § 4.

§ 1333.
Repealed.
1961, No. 210, § 17, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1334.
Judgment; exception.

Any liability for contributions, payments, penalties, interest, and costs imposed under this chapter becomes, from the time the liability is due and payable, a debt of the liable employer or employing unit to the State for the benefit of the Unemployment Compensation Fund and the Contingent Fund to be recovered in a civil action.

The Commissioner may file in the Superior Court for the county wherein the employer resides, or the Washington Superior Court if the employer is a nonresident, a certified copy of an assessment for contributions from which an appeal has not been taken within the time allowed therefor, whereupon such court after due notice to all parties interested, shall summarily render a final judgment in accordance therewith. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though such judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court, provided, however, there shall not be an appeal therefrom except on matters of law heard and determined in such court.

When an assessment has been made under section 1330 of this title from which a timely appeal has not been taken or when any appeal taken has been finally determined under sections 1331 and 1332 of this title, the Commissioner may, as an additional or alternate remedy to other remedies and proceedings authorized by this chapter, issue a warrant directed to the sheriff of any county of this State. The warrant shall command the sheriff to levy upon and sell the real and personal property of any person liable for unpaid contributions, payments, interest, penalties, and costs due under this chapter, for payment of the amount due and the cost of executing the warrant, and to return the warrant to the Commissioner and to pay him or her the money collected by virtue of the warrant within 60 days after receipt of the warrant. The sheriff shall within five days after receipt of the warrant file with the county clerk a copy of the warrant, and the clerk shall then enter in the judgment docket the name of the person liable, the amount of the contributions, payments, interest, penalties, and costs for which the warrant is issued and the date when the copy is filed. The levy and sale shall be effected in the manner prescribed for levy of execution. If a warrant is returned not fully satisfied, the Commissioner may from time to time issue new warrants for the balance due in accordance with the procedure described hereinabove.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1977, No. 64

, § 15.

§ 1335.
Repealed.
1961, No. 210, § 17, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1336.
Lien, fee, foreclosure.

All contributions, interest, penalties, and costs thereon due and payable by an employer under the provisions of this chapter shall be a lien upon the real estate of such employer from the date a lien for such contributions, interest, penalties, and costs is entered in the land records of the town in which is located real estate of the employer. A lien for such contributions, penalties, interest, and costs shall be created upon the personal property or franchises of the employer if such lien is recorded in the town clerk’s office of the town in which the employer resides; and, if the employer is a corporation or a co-partnership, then such lien on the franchises or personal property of such employer shall be recorded in the town clerk’s office in the town in which such employer has its principal place of business in the State. Liens created under this section shall show name of employer, amount of contributions, and other indebtedness due to the Commissioner of Labor. A lien created under this section shall be a lien prior to all other liens except liens created for taxes due the State of Vermont, the federal government, or town or municipality in this State and wage claims. Such lien shall not be a prior lien to liens on record prior to the recording of the lien provided for herein.

There shall be paid to the town clerk by the Commissioner for recording each such lien, and the discharge of a recorded lien, the fees prescribed in

32 V.S.A. § 1671

. The fees shall be added to the amount due from the employer under the lien.

An employer upon whose property a lien is created as provided herein shall be given due notice thereof by ordinary or certified mail within five days after the creation of such lien.

When the contributions, interest, penalties, and costs, secured by a lien in accordance with this section, remains unpaid for 90 days after the creation of such lien, such lien on personal property may be foreclosed in the same manner as provided by law for the foreclosure of mortgages on personal property; and such a lien on real property may be foreclosed in the same manner as provided by law for the foreclosure of mortgages on real property. The foregoing remedy shall be in addition, or as an alternative, to the remedy provided by section 1329 of this title, for the collection of unpaid contributions.

In the event the employer files a written protest to the creation of the lien within 30 days after date thereof, assessment proceedings as provided in sections 1329-1334 of this title shall be had.

If final judgment is in favor of the employer the property of the employer shall be discharged from the lien. If final judgment is against the employer, the property under the lien shall be held to respond to the judgment rendered and may be taken in execution thereon unless the employer otherwise satisfies the execution and charges.

The Commissioner shall issue and record a certificate of release of the lien if:

The Commissioner finds that the liability for contributions due, together with interest, penalty, and costs, has been satisfied or has become unenforceable.

There is furnished to the Commissioner a bond with surety approved by the Commissioner in a penal sum sufficient to equal the amount of contributions due, together with interest, penalty, and costs, said bond to be conditioned upon the payment of any judgment rendered in proceedings regularly instituted by the Commissioner to enforce collection thereof.

The Commissioner determines at any time that the interest of the State of Vermont in the property has no value.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1963, No. 58

;

1969, No. 40

, § 1, eff. April 4, 1969;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

1989, No. 8

, §§ 4, 5;

1991, No. 82

, § 5;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1337.
Adjustments and refunds.

If not later than three years after the date on which any contributions or interest thereon became due, an employer who has paid such contributions or interest thereon shall make application for an adjustment thereof in connection with subsequent contribution payments, or for a refund thereof because such adjustment cannot be made, and the Commissioner shall determine that such payments or any portion thereof were erroneously collected, the Commissioner shall allow such employer to make an adjustment thereof, without interest, in connection with subsequent payments by him or her, or if such adjustment cannot be made, shall refund said amount without interest from the fund. For like cause and within the same period, adjustment or refund may be so made on the Commissioner’s own initiative.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1997, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 1337a.
Administrative determination; hearing on.

Any employing unit aggrieved by an administrative determination affecting its rate of contributions, its rights to adjustment or refund on contributions paid, its coverage as an employer, or its termination of coverage may, within 30 days after date thereof, file with the Commissioner a petition for a hearing thereon, which petition shall set forth specifically and in detail the grounds upon which it is claimed the administrative determination is erroneous. Hearing or hearings on such petition shall be held by a referee appointed for such purpose, at such times and places as may be provided by rules of the Board, and due notice of the time and place of such hearing or hearings shall be given by ordinary or certified mail to the petitioner.

After hearing as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the petitioner shall be promptly notified by ordinary or certified mail of the findings of fact, conclusions, and decision of the referee. The decision of the referee shall be final unless the employing unit or Commissioner makes application for review thereof by the Board within 30 days after date thereof or unless the Board, on its own motion within said period, initiates a review thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 210

, § 10, eff. July 11, 1961; amended

1965, No. 76

, § 1, eff. May 26, 1965;

1989, No. 8

, § 6;

1991, No. 82

, § 6.